Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-17,107
Waiver of reserve requirements.

The director may waive, in whole or in part, and on a general or case-by-case basis, the reserving requirements of sections 21-17,103 to 21-17,107 when, in his or her opinion, such a waiver is necessary or desirable to protect the public interest and fulfill the purpose of the Credit Union Act.

Laws 1996, LB 948, § 107.